District of Columbia statutes.
47-464

Tax Revision Commission — Authority.

(a)

The Chairperson of the Commission, or his or her designated representative, who must be a member of the Commission, shall convene all meetings of the Commission. Six members of the Commission shall constitute a quorum. Voting by proxy shall not be permitted.

(b)

The Commission shall have the authority to create and operate under its own rules of procedure, consistent with this subchapter and Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.].

(c)

All recommendations and reports prepared and submitted by the Commission shall be a matter of public record.

(d)

The Commission, or committees thereof, may, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this subchapter, hold hearings, and shall sit and act at such times and places and administer oaths as required.

(e)

The Commission shall have the authority to request directly from each department, agency, or instrumentality of the District Government, and each department, agency, or instrumentality is hereby authorized to furnish directly to the Commission upon its request, any information reasonably considered necessary by the Commission to carry out its functions under this subchapter.

(f)

The Commission is authorized to use space and supplies owned or rented by the District government. The Commission is further authorized to use staff loaned from the Council or detailed by the Mayor for such purposes consistent with this subchapter as the Commission may determine.

(g)

The Commission’s operations shall be funded by annual appropriations, private sector assistance, or both.

(h)

If a special fund is established by the Commission for the receipt of operating donations from non-government sources, the fund shall be administered in accordance with established funding and auditing procedures of the District government. The expenditure of such donations shall not be subject to appropriation. The Commission shall keep a record, available to the public for inspection, of all such donations and any substantial non-government in-kind contributions received. The record shall include the full name, address, and occupation or type of business of each donor. “Substantial non-government in-kind contributions” shall include any service reasonably valued at more than $5,000 which is received from any source other than the District or federal government.

June 13, 1996, D.C. Law 11-143, § 5, 43 DCR 2170
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 7062(d), 58 DCR 6226
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 114(q), 59 DCR 6190
1981 Ed., § 47-464.
D.C. Law 19-21, in subsec. (a), substituted “Six members” for “Seven members”; and, in subsec. (e), substituted “information reasonably considered” for “information deemed”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “this subchapter” for “this act” in (b), (d), (e), and (f); and substituted “Chapter 5 of Title 2” for “the Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (§ 2-501 et seq.)” in (b).
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-461.
“This act”, referred to in subsections (b), (d), (e), and (f) is D.C. Law 11-143, which is codified at §§ 47-461 through 47-815.